District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fiscal Accountability and Homeownership Opportunity Act of 2026”.
TITLE I. HOMEOWNERSHIP SUPPORT THROUGH DOWNTOWN
CONVERSION TAX INCENTIVE ACCOUNTABILITY.
Sec. 101. Section 2(b) of the Home Purchase Assistance Fund Act of 1978, effective
September 12, 1978 (D.C. Law 2-103; D.C. Official Code § 42-2601(b)) is amended as follows:

(a) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in its
place.
(c) A new paragraph (8) is added to read as follows:
“(8) All recaptured tax abatements under D.C. Official Code §§ 47-860.03 and 47-
870.01.”.
Sec. 102. Chapter 8 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 47-860.03(a)(2)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “effect. A property” and
inserting the phrase “effect. Upon transmission of the letter of termination to the Office of Tax
and Revenue, the Office of Tax and Revenue shall assess and collect any tax benefits improperly
received during any period of ineligibility determined by the Mayor prior to the issuance of the
letter of termination, plus interest as provided by law. Amounts recaptured pursuant to this
subparagraph, including interest, shall be deposited into the Home Purchase Assistance Fund
established by § 42-2601. A property” in its place.
(b) Section 47-870.01 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(2)(F) is amended by striking the phrase “The Mayor may
cancel” and inserting the phrase “The Mayor shall cancel” in its place.
(2) Subsection (d) is amended by adding a new paragraph (6) to read as follows:
“(6)(A) Any portion of the temporary tax abatement authority authorized under
this subsection that remains uncommitted as of September 30, 2030, and at the end of each fiscal
year thereafter, including any amounts not certified by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (e) of

this section, shall no longer be available for certification under this section.
“(B) The Office of Tax and Revenue shall calculate the aggregate dollar
amount of unused temporary tax abatement authority as of September 30, 2030.
“(C) An amount equal to the unused temporary tax abatement authority
identified pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall be deposited into the Home
Purchase Assistance Fund established by § 42-2601.”.
(3) Subsection (e) is amended by adding a new paragraph (3) to read as follows:
“(3)(A) If the Mayor determines that a property previously certified under
paragraph (1) of this subsection is no longer eligible to receive the temporary tax abatement
because the property no longer meets the eligibility requirements of this section, any rules issued
by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (a)(1)(B) of this section, or any criteria set forth in the
applicable selection process, the Mayor shall transmit written notice of decertification to the
property owner and to the Office of Tax and Revenue, setting forth the reason for the
decertification and the effective date.
“(B) Upon receipt of the notice of decertification, the Office of Tax and
Revenue shall assess and collect any tax benefits improperly received during any period of
ineligibility, plus interest.
“(C) Amounts recaptured pursuant to this paragraph, including interest,
shall be deposited into the Home Purchase Assistance Fund established by § 42-2601.”.
TITLE II. BIENNIAL TAX EXPENDITURE REVIEWS.
Sec. 201. Section 7133(a) of the Tax Transparency and Effectiveness Act of 2014,
effective February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-155; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.157(a)), is amended
by striking the phrase “5-year” and inserting the word “biennial” in its place.

TITLE III. REGIONAL ECONOMIC AND FISCAL COMPARATIVE ANALYSIS
SUBTITLE A. REGIONAL ECONOMIC COMPETITIVENESS DASHBOARD
Sec. 301. Regional economic dashboard requirement.
(a) The Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall publish and maintain a publicly
accessible regional economic dashboard.
(b) The dashboard shall compare key economic and fiscal indicators for the District of
Columbia and jurisdictions within the surrounding metropolitan region.
(c) The dashboard shall include, at a minimum, quantitative indicators within the
following categories to assess the District’s regional economic competitiveness:
(1) Housing production and development;
(2) Industry and employment;
(3) Income and wage growth;
(4) Business formation and commercial real estate;
(5) Tax competitiveness;
(6) Talent attraction and retention; and
100 (7) Any additional categories the Chief Financial Officer determines are necessary
101 to assess the District’s regional economic competitiveness.
102 (d) The Office of the Chief Financial Officer shall select, define, and periodically update
103 the specific indicators included within each category listed in subsection (c) of this section and
104 shall publish a description of the methodology and data sources used for each indicator.
105 (e) The dashboard shall:
106 (1) Be updated at least annually, to the extent data is available;
107 (2) Identify data sources; and

108 (3) Present data in a format that is searchable and downloadable.
109 (f) The first publication of the dashboard shall occur no later than 360 days after the
110 effective date of this subtitle.
111 SUBTITLE B. COMPARATIVE REGIONAL FISCAL ANALYSIS
112 Sec. 311. The General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006
113 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a), is amended by adding a new subsection (d) to
114 read as follows:
115 “(d) Comparative regional analysis for measures with significant fiscal impact.
116 “(1) For any bill or resolution for which the Chief Financial Officer prepares a
117 fiscal impact statement estimating a fiscal impact that exceeds $20 million over the 4-year
118 financial plan period, the fiscal impact statement shall include a comparative regional analysis.
119 “(2) The comparative regional analysis shall identify:
120 “(A) Whether jurisdictions within the surrounding metropolitan region
121 have enacted a similar measure;
122 “(B) If so, a summary of the fiscal impact or estimated cost of the similar
123 measure, to the extent publicly available; and
124 “(C) Any material differences in population, tax structure, funding
125 mechanisms, or implementation that affect comparability.
126 “(3) If comparable data is not publicly available, the fiscal impact statement shall
127 note that fact.”.
128 TITLE IV. STANDARD PROVISIONS
129 Sec. 401. Fiscal impact statement.
130 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal

131 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
132 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
133 Sec. 402. Effective date.
134 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
135 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
136 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
137 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
138 Columbia Register.